Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-195
Credential; disciplinary action; costs; when not collectible; how paid.

All costs accrued at the instance of the state when it is the successful party in a proceeding to discipline a credential, which the Attorney General certifies cannot be collected from the defendant, shall be paid out of any available funds in the Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 57, p. 468;

C.S.1929, § 71-612;

R.S.1943, § 71-158;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 387;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 119;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-158;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 95.